District of Columbia statutes.
6-623.03

Office of Zoning — Transfer of functions of Zoning Secretariat of Office of Planning.

In accordance with § 1-204.04(b), the functions of the Zoning Secretariat of the Office of Planning, under the direction of the Deputy Mayor for Economic Development pursuant to the Establishment of the Office of Economic Development, effective January 3, 1983 (M.O. 83-18; 30 DCR 319 ), and any position, property, record, unexpended balance of appropriations, allocation, or other funds available to or to be made available relating to the functions of the Zoning Secretariat of the Office of Planning, are transferred to the Office of Zoning established by § 6-623.01.

History

Sept. 20, 1990, D.C. Law 8-163, § 4, 37 DCR 4676

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-412.3.

Editor's Notes

Section effective October 1, 1991: Section 7(b) of D.C. Law 8-163 provided that the provisions of the act shall not apply until October 1, 1991.